Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.180

Sale of decedent's contract interest in land.

If the deceased person at the time of his or her death was possessed of a contract for the purchase of lands, his or her interest in such lands under such contract may be sold on the application of his or her personal representative in the same manner as if he or she died seized of such lands; and the same proceedings may be had for that purpose as are prescribed in this title in respect to lands of which he or she died seized, except as hereinafter provided.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2049; 1965 c 145 s 11.56.180. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 139; RRS s 1509; prior: Code 1881 s 1519; 1854 p 289 s 129.]

NOTES:

Performance of decedent's contracts: Chapter 11.60 RCW.

Sale of vendor's interest in contract for sale of real estate: RCW 11.56.020.